Washington statutes.
RCW 7.21.020

Sanctions—Who may impose.

A judge or commissioner of the supreme court, the court of appeals, or the superior court, a judge of a court of limited jurisdiction, and a commissioner of a court of limited jurisdiction may impose a sanction for contempt of court under this chapter.

[ 1998 c 3 s 1; 1989 c 373 s 2.]